District of Columbia statutes.
1-131

Application of honoraria limitations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 1-135, the honoraria limitations imposed by part H of subchapter I of Chapter 11 of this title [repealed; see now § 1-1162.26] shall apply to a Senator or Representative elected pursuant to § 1-123(d)(1), only if the salary of the Senator or Representative is supported by public revenues.

June 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-135, § 4, 37 DCR 2616
1981 Ed., § 1-113a.